Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/sw_TZ.dic
anguka/A
kuwa/A
panda/A
vyo/A
wapa/A
anza/A
fika/A
o/A
toka/A
zoea/A
a/A
kwisha/A
pata/A
sema/A
eleza/A
endelea/A
fanya/A
kufa/A
po/A
zo/A
kula/A
weza/A
